Hawaii statutes.
§501-105 Grantee's address, etc., to be
stated. Every deed or other voluntary instrument presented for recording
shall contain or have indorsed upon it the full name or names, if more than
one, and the address of the grantee or other person acquiring or claiming an
interest under the instrument and every document shall also contain or have
indorsed upon it a statement that the grantee is married or unmarried, and if
married, the statement shall give the name in full of the husband or wife.
Whenever the grantee is a corporation or partnership, the document shall
contain or have indorsed upon it the state where the entity is registered and
the entity's address. All names and addresses shall also be entered on all
certificates. Notices and processes issued in relation to registered land in
pursuance of this chapter may be served upon any person in interest by mailing
the same to the address so given, and shall be binding whether such person
resides within or without the State.

Any deed conveying one or more but not all lots
or all interests in a lot appurtenant to apartments or units in a condominium
project in a certificate shall contain full memoranda relating to easements,
rights-of-way, and all other liens and encumbrances affecting the particular lot,
lots, interest appurtenant to an apartment or unit, or interests appurtenant to
apartments or units conveyed. If the deed affects all of the land or interests
appurtenant to apartments or units in a certificate of title, encumbrances may
be referred to by reference. [L 1903, c 56, §54; am L 1907, c 43, §4; RL 1925,
§3243; RL 1935, §5053; RL 1945, §12653; RL 1955, §342-54; HRS §501-105; am L
1986, c 246, §6; am L 1989, c 51, §1; am L 1992, c 197, §3; am L 1995, c 22, §4;
am L 2008, c 28, §29]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next